Tennessee, session 114, SB0039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding a charter, resolution, or another law to the contrary, a county
legislative body may recall a person appointed to a position by the county legislative
body upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body. This section does not apply to
a person appointed by a county legislative body to fill a vacancy in the general
assembly.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0039
000438
- 1 -